District of Columbia statutes.
31-4330

Contractual rights of minors.

Any minor of the age of 15 years or more may, notwithstanding such minority, contract for life, health, and accident insurance on his own life for his or her own benefit or for the benefit of his father, mother, spouse, child, brother, sister, or for the benefit of any person who has the care or custody of said minor or with whom said minor makes his or her home, and may exercise all such contractual rights with respect to any such contract of insurance as might be exercised by a person of full legal age and may at any time surrender his or her interest in any such insurance or give a valid discharge for any benefit accruing or money payable thereunder.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1142, ch. 672, ch. II, § 31
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 28(b), 55 DCR 6758

History

1981 Ed., § 35-430.
1973 Ed., § 35-430.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 17-231 substituted “spouse” for “husband, wife”.

Effect of Amendments